Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.30.070

Employing minors.

Where applicable, career awareness and exploration, career connected learning, career launch programs, and career preparation programs are subject to RCW 49.12.121 and 49.12.123 regarding employing minors.

[ 2019 c 406 s 58.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.